Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 2 Grants of Pardons, Paroles, and Other Relief

Cross references.

Authority of judge in fixing sentence to specify that offender may be considered for parole prior to completion of any minimum requirement otherwise imposed by law relating to completion of service of specified time before parole eligibility, §

17-10-1

.

Restrictions on granting of parole to person convicted of fourth felony offense, §

17-10-7

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Pardons and paroles, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Board of Pardons and Paroles, Chapters 475-1 through 475-3.

42-9-39.
Restrictions on relief for person serving a second life sentence.

The provisions of this Code section shall be binding upon the board in granting pardons and paroles, notwithstanding any other provisions of this article or any other law relating to the powers of the board.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 17-10-7, when a person is convicted of murder and sentenced to life imprisonment and such person has previously been incarcerated under a life sentence, such person shall serve at least 30 years in the penitentiary before being granted a pardon and before becoming eligible for parole.

When a person receives consecutive life sentences as the result of offenses occurring in the same series of acts and any one of the life sentences is imposed for the crime of murder, such person shall serve consecutive 30 year periods for each such sentence, up to a maximum of 60 years, before being eligible for parole consideration.

Any other provisions of this Code section to the contrary notwithstanding, the board shall have the authority to pardon any person convicted of a crime who is subsequently determined to be innocent of said crime.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-9-39

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 523, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959, § 14; Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 27/HB 1059.

Cross references.

Power and authority of the board to grant reprieves, pardons, paroles, and other relief, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IV, Sec. II, Para. II.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959, § 18, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become
effective on January 1, 1995, upon ratification by the voters of this state at the 1994 November general election of that proposed amendment to Article IV, Section II, Paragraph II of the Constitution authorizing the General Assembly to provide for mandatory minimum sentences and sentences of life without possibility of parole in certain cases and providing restrictions on the authority of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles to grant paroles.” That amendment was ratified by the voters on November 8, 1994, so this Code section, as set out above, became effective on January 1, 1995.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Sentence Reform Act of 1994.’ ”

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly declares and finds:

“(1) That persons who are convicted of certain serious violent felonies shall serve minimum terms of imprisonment which shall not be suspended, probated, stayed, deferred, or otherwise withheld by the sentencing judge; and

“(2) That sentences ordered by courts in cases of certain serious violent felonies shall be served in their entirety and shall not be reduced by parole or by any earned time, early release, work release, or other such sentence-reducing measures administered by the Department of Corrections.”

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The provisions of this Act shall apply only to those offenses committed on or after the effective date of this Act; provided, however, that any conviction occurring prior to, on, or after the effective date of this Act shall be deemed a ‘conviction’ for the purposes of this Act and shall be counted in determining the appropriate sentence to be imposed for any offense committed on or after the effective date of this Act.”

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959, § 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 180, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“The General Assembly declares and finds: (1) That the ‘Sentence Reform Act of 1994,’ approved April 20, 1994 (Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959), provided that persons convicted of one of seven serious violent felonies shall serve minimum mandatory terms of imprisonment which shall not otherwise be suspended, stayed, probated, deferred, or withheld by the sentencing court; (2) That in

State v. Allmond

,

225 Ga. App. 509

(1997), the Georgia Court of Appeals held, notwithstanding the ‘Sentence Reform Act of 1994,’ that the provisions of the First Offender Act would still be available to the sentencing court, which would mean that a person who committed a serious violent felony could be sentenced to less than the minimum mandatory ten-year sentence; and (3) That, contrary to the decision in

State v. Allmond

, it is the expressed intent of the General Assembly that persons who commit a serious violent felony specified in the ‘Sentence Reform Act of 1994’ shall be sentenced to a mandatory term of imprisonment of not less than ten years and shall not be eligible for first offender treatment.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 30/HB 1059, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “The provisions of this Act shall not affect or abate the status as a crime of any such act or omission which occurred prior to the effective date of the Act repealing, repealing and reenacting, or amending such law, nor shall the prosecution of such crime be abated as a result of such repeal, repeal and reenactment, or amendment.”

Law reviews.

For note on the 1994 amendment of this Code section, see 11 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 159 (1994).

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 11 (2006).

42-9-40.
Parole guidelines system.

The board shall adopt, implement, and maintain a parole guidelines system for determining parole action. The guidelines system shall be used in determining parole actions on all inmates, except those serving life sentences, who will become statutorily eligible for parole consideration. The system shall be consistent with the board’s primary goal of protecting society and shall take into consideration the severity of the current offense, the inmate’s prior criminal history, the inmate’s conduct, and the social factors which the board has found to have value in predicting the probability of further criminal behavior and successful adjustment under parole supervision.

The guidelines system required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be adopted by rules or regulations of the board. The rules or regulations shall be adopted in conformity with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 404, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article critically analyzing the adoption of determinate-based sentencing, see 17 Ga. L. Rev. 425 (1983).

42-9-41.
Duty of board to obtain and place in records information respecting persons subject to relief or placed on probation; investigations; rules.

It shall be the duty of the board to obtain and place in its permanent records information as complete as may be practicable on every person who may become subject to any relief which may be within the power of the board to grant. The information shall be obtained as soon as possible after imposition of the sentence and shall include:

A complete statement of the crime for which the person is sentenced, the circumstances of the crime, and the nature of the person’s sentence;

The court in which the person was sentenced;

The term of his or her sentence;

The name of the presiding judge, the prosecuting officers, the investigating officers, and the attorney for the person convicted;

A copy of presentence investigation and any previous court record;

A fingerprint record;

A copy of all probation reports which may have been made; and

Any social, physical, mental, or criminal record of the person.

The board in its discretion may also obtain and place in its permanent records similar information on each person who may be placed on probation. The board shall immediately examine such records and any other records obtained and make such other investigation as it may deem necessary. It shall be the duty of the court and of all community supervision officers and other appropriate officers to furnish to the board, upon its request, such information as may be in their possession or under their control. The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities and all other state, county, and city agencies, all sheriffs and their deputies, and all peace officers shall cooperate with the board and shall aid and assist it in the performance of its duties. The board may make such rules as to the privacy or privilege of such information and as to its use by persons other than the board and its staff as may be deemed expedient in the performance of its duties, provided that such rules do not conflict with Code Section 42-9-61.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 12; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-85/HB 310; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-9/SB 174; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 42/SB 52.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “community supervision officers” for “probation officers” in the third sentence of subsection (b). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added the proviso at the end of the last sentence of subsection (b).

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, inserted “or her” in paragraph (a)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

42-9-42.
Procedure for granting relief from sentence; conditions and prerequisites; public access to information; violation of parole.

No person shall be granted clemency, pardon, parole, or other relief from sentence except by a majority vote of the board. A majority of the members of the board may commute a death sentence to life imprisonment, as provided in Code Section 42-9-20.

As used in this subsection, the term “serious offense” means:

A serious violent felony as such term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1; or

A felony offense of:

False imprisonment in violation of Code Section 16-5-41 when the victim is not the child of the accused and the victim is less than 14 years of age;

Aggravated assault in violation of Code Section 16-5-21;

Aggravated battery in violation of Code Section 16-5-24;

Trafficking of persons for labor or sexual servitude in violation of Code Section 16-5-46;

Cruelty to children in violation of Code Section 16-5-70;

Stalking in violation of Code Section 16-5-90;

Aggravated stalking in violation of Code Section 16-5-91;

Exploitation and intimidation of disabled adults, elder persons, and residents in violation of Code Section 16-5-102;

Sodomy in violation of Code Section 16-6-2;

Statutory rape in violation of Code Section 16-6-3;

Child molestation in violation of Code Section 16-6-4;

Enticing a child for indecent purposes in violation of Code Section 16-6-5;

Sexual assault of certain persons in violation of Code Section 16-6-5.1;

Incest in violation of Code Section 16-6-22;

Sexual battery in violation of Code Section 16-6-22.1;

Burglary in violation of Code Section 16-7-1;

Home invasion in violation of Code Section 16-7-5;

Arson in violation of Code Section 16-7-60;

Possession, manufacture, transport, distribution, possession with the intent to distribute, or offering to distribute an explosive device in violation of Code Section 16-7-82;

Possessing, transporting, or receiving explosives or destructive devices with the intent to kill, injure, or intimidate individuals or destroy public buildings in violation of Code Section 16-7-88;

Theft by receiving stolen property in violation of Code Section 16-8-7;

Robbery in violation of Code Section 16-8-40;

Sexual exploitation of children in violation of Code Section 16-12-100;

Drug related objects in violation of Code Section 16-13-1;

Approval by the federal Food and Drug Administration as prerequisite to certain sales in violation of Code Section 16-13-4;

Purchase, possession, manufacture, distribution, or sale of controlled substances or marijuana in violation of Code Section 16-13-30;

Licenses for sale, transfer, or purchase for resale of products containing pseudoephedrine; reporting and record-keeping requirements in violation of Code Section 16-13-30.4;

Possession of substances with intent to use or convey such substances for the manufacture of Schedule I or Schedule II controlled substances in violation of Code Section 16-13-30.5;

Trafficking in cocaine, illegal drugs, marijuana, or methamphetamine in violation of Code Section 16-13-31;

Trafficking in ecstasy in violation of Code Section 16-13-31.1;

Transactions in drug related objects in violation of Code Section 16-13-32;

Transactions in drug related objects in violation of Code Section 16-13-32.1;

Use of a communication facility in committing or facilitating commission of an act which constitutes a felony in violation of Code Section 16-13-32.3;

Manufacturing, distributing, dispensing, or possessing controlled substances in, on, or near public or private schools in violation of Code Section 16-13-32.4;

Manufacturing, distributing, dispensing, or possessing controlled substances, marijuana, or counterfeit substances near a park or housing project in violation of Code Section 16-13-32.5;

Manufacturing, distributing, dispensing, or possessing with intent to distribute controlled substances or marijuana in, on, or within a drug-free commercial zone in violation of Code Section 16-13-32.6;

Unauthorized distribution and dispensation of a controlled substance in violation of Code Section 16-13-42;

Unauthorized distribution of a controlled substance in violation of Code Section 16-13-43;

A violation of Article 3 of Chapter 13 of Title 16 involving dangerous drugs;

A violation of Chapter 14 of Title 16 involving racketeer influenced and corrupt organizations; or

Participating in gang activity in violation of Code Section 16-15-4.

A grant of pardon, parole, or other relief from sentence shall be rendered only by a written decision which shall be signed by at least the number of board members required for the relief granted and which shall become a part of such individual’s permanent record.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 or any provisions of this chapter relating to the confidentiality of records, a written decision relating to a pardon for a serious offense or commutation of a death sentence shall:

Include the board’s findings which reflect the board’s consideration of the evidence offered that supports the board’s decision; and

Be available for public inspection.

Good conduct, achievement of a fifth-grade level or higher on standardized reading tests, and efficient performance of duties by an inmate shall be considered by the board in his or her favor and shall merit consideration of an application for pardon or parole. No inmate shall be placed on parole until and unless the board shall find that there is reasonable probability that, if he or she is so released, he or she will live and conduct himself or herself as a respectable and law-abiding person and that his or her release will be compatible with his or her own welfare and the welfare of society. Furthermore, no person shall be released on pardon or placed on parole unless and until the board is satisfied that he or she will be suitably employed in self-sustaining employment or that he or she will not become a public charge. However, notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the board may, in its discretion, grant pardon or parole to any aged or disabled persons.

Any person who is paroled shall be released on such terms and conditions as the board shall prescribe, and if he or she is serving a split sentence, the board’s conditions shall include all of the terms of probation imposed by the sentencing court. The board shall diligently see that no peonage is allowed in the guise of parole relationship or supervision. The parolee shall remain in the legal custody of the board until the expiration of the maximum term specified in his or her sentence, he or she is pardoned by the board, or his or her supervision is terminated as provided in Code Section 42-9-52.

The board may require the payment of a parole supervision fee of at least $10.00 per month as a condition of parole or conditional release. The monthly amount shall be set by rule of the board and shall be uniform state wide. Such fees shall be collected by the department to be paid into the general fund of the state treasury.

If a parolee or conditional releasee violates the terms of his or her parole or conditional release, he or she shall be subject to rearrest or extradition for placement in the actual custody of the board, to be redelivered to any state or county correctional institution of this state or placed in any other Department of Corrections facility, including a probation detention center, not to exceed 180 days, or in a residential substance abuse treatment facility, as such term is defined in Code Section 42-8-111, as deemed appropriate by the board. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit or restrict the authority of the commissioner of corrections in making custodial assignments.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 13; Ga. L. 1974, p. 474, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 795, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 775, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 414, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1596, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 207, § 3/HB 71; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-86/HB 310; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-10/SB 174.

The 2015 amendments.

The first 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (b), designated the provisions as paragraph (2), added paragraphs (1) and (3); and, in paragraph (2), deleted “clemency,” following “A grant of”. The second 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, inserted “or she” near the end of paragraph (d)(1), and substituted “department” for “board” near the end of paragraph (d)(2). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (c), inserted “or her” and “or she” throughout, and inserted “or herself” in the second sentence; in paragraph (d)(1), added “, and if he or she is serving a split sentence, the board’s conditions shall include all of the terms of probation imposed by the sentencing court” at the end of the first sentence, and in the last sentence, substituted a comma for “or until” near the middle, and added “, or his or her supervision is terminated as provided in Code Section 42-9-52” at the end; in paragraph (d)(2), deleted “other” preceding “conditional” near the end of the first sentence, and deleted the former third and fourth sentences, which read: “The board may require or the parolee or person under conditional release may request that up to 24 months of the supervision fee be paid in advance of the time to be spent on parole or conditional release.
In such cases, any advance payments are nonreimbursable in the event of parole or conditional release revocation or if parole or conditional release is otherwise terminated prior to the expiration of the sentence being served on parole or conditional release.”; and substituted the present provisions of subsection (e) for the former provisions, which read: “If a parolee violates the terms of his parole, he shall be subject to rearrest or extradition for placement in the actual custody of the board, to be redelivered to any state or county correctional institution of this state.”

Cross references.

Power of board to order adult offender to make restitution to victim as condition of any relief ordered, §

17-14-3

.

Power of board to grant parole prior to completion of one-third of sentence if restitution to victim is ordered as condition of parole, §

17-14-4

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

42-9-42.1.
Use of HIV test results in granting relief from sentence; conditions.

Any term used in this Code section and defined in Code Section 31-22-9.1 shall have the meaning provided for such term in Code Section 31-22-9.1.

The board is authorized to obtain from any penal institution, with at least 60 days prior notice to that institution, and any such penal institution is authorized to provide the board with HIV test results regarding any person who applies or is eligible for clemency, a pardon, a parole, or other relief from a sentence or to require such person to submit to an HIV test and to consider the results of any such test in determining whether to grant clemency, a pardon, a parole, or other relief to such person. Test results obtained pursuant to the authority of this Code section may not be the sole basis for determining whether to grant or deny any such relief to such person, however. The board is further authorized to impose conditions upon any person to whom the board grants clemency, a pardon, a parole, or other relief and who is determined by an HIV test to be infected with HIV, which conditions may include without being limited to those designed to prevent the spread of HIV by that person.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-9-42.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1799, § 10.

Cross references.

Child committing delinquent act constituting AIDS transmission crime including testing and reporting, §

15-11-603

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 1799, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) and its causative agent, including Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV), pose a grave threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state. In the absence of any effective vaccination or treatment for this disease, it threatens almost certain death to all who contract it. The disease is largely transmitted through sexual contacts and intravenous drug use, not through casual contact, and, while deadly, is therefore preventable. The key component of the fight against AIDS is education. Through public education and counseling our citizens can learn how the disease is transmitted and, thus, how to protect themselves and prevent its spread. The Department of Human Resources is encouraged to continue its efforts to educate all Georgians about the disease, its causative agent, and its means of transmission. In addition, voluntary testing should be encouraged for anyone who feels at risk of infection. While education, counseling, and voluntary testing are vital to the elimination of this epidemic, other measures are needed to protect the health of our citizens, and it is the intention of the General Assembly to enact such measures in the exercise of its police powers in order to deal with AIDS and HIV infection.”

42-9-43.
Information to be considered by board generally; conduct of investigation and examination; determination as to grant of relief.

The board, in considering any case within its power, shall cause to be brought before it all pertinent information on the person in question. Included therein shall be:

A report by the superintendent, warden, or jailer of the jail or state or county correctional institution in which the person has been confined upon the conduct of record of the person while in such jail or state or county correctional institution;

A report of the conduct of record of the person serving a sentence for a serious violent felony, as such term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1, who is in the custody of the Department of Corrections;

The results of such physical and mental examinations as may have been made of the person;

The extent to which the person appears to have responded to the efforts made to improve his or her social attitude;

The industrial record of the person while confined, the nature of his or her occupations while so confined, and a recommendation as to the kind of work he or she is best fitted to perform and at which he or she is most likely to succeed when and if he or she is released;

The educational programs in which the person has participated and the level of education which the person has attained based on standardized reading tests;

The written statements or oral testimony, if any, of the district attorney of the circuit in which the person was sentenced expressing views and making any recommendation as to parole, conditional release, a pardon for a serious offense, as such term is defined in Code Section 42-9-42, or commutation of a death sentence;

The written, oral, audiotaped, or videotaped testimony of the victim, the victim’s family, or a witness having personal knowledge of the victim’s personal characteristics, including any information prepared by the victim or any individual offering or preparing information on behalf of the victim, for the purpose of the board’s consideration of a parole, conditional release, pardon, or commutation of a death sentence if the victim has provided such information to the board; and

If the person is or was required to register pursuant to Code Section 42-1-12, any court order issued releasing the person from registration requirements or residency or employment restrictions.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Debilitating terminal illness” means a disease that cannot be cured or adequately treated and that is reasonably expected to result in death within 12 months.

“Entirely incapacitated” means an offender who:

Requires assistance in order to perform two or more necessary daily life functions or who is completely immobile; and

Has such limited physical or mental ability, strength, or capacity that he or she poses an extremely low risk of physical threat to others or to the community.

“Necessary daily life function” means eating, breathing, dressing, grooming, toileting, walking, or bathing.

The board may issue a medical reprieve to an entirely incapacitated person suffering a progressively debilitating terminal illness in accordance with Article IV, Section II, Paragraph II of the Constitution.

The board shall give at least 30 days’ advance written notification to the district attorney of the circuit in which the person was sentenced whenever it considers making a final decision on a pardon for a serious offense, as such term is defined in Code Section 42-9-42, and at least 90 days’ advance written notification to such district attorney prior to making a final decision on parole or conditional release for a person sentenced for a serious violent felony, as such term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1, and shall provide the district attorney an opportunity to submit information and file a written objection to such actions and shall also provide the person being considered for parole or conditional release an opportunity to submit information.

Within 72 hours of receiving a request to commute a death sentence, the board shall provide written notification to the district attorney of the circuit in which the person was sentenced of the date set for hearing such request and shall provide the district attorney an opportunity to submit information and file a written response to such request.

The board may also make such other investigation as it may deem necessary in order to be fully informed about the person.

Before releasing any person on parole or conditional release, granting a pardon, or commuting a death sentence, the board may have the person appear before it and may personally examine him or her and consider any information it deems relevant or necessary. When objections to relief have been tendered, the board may hold a hearing and consider oral testimony. If the board holds a hearing, it shall provide the district attorney of the circuit in which the person was sentenced 30 days’ notice via email of such hearing date and the district attorney or his or her designee may attend such hearing and present evidence to the board and shall also provide the person being considered 30 days’ notice of such hearing date and he or she may present evidence to the board. Upon consideration of the reports, files, records, information, and oral testimony submitted, the board shall make its findings and determine whether or not such person shall be granted a pardon, parole, or other relief within the power of the board and determine the terms and conditions thereof, and if such person is serving a split sentence, the board’s conditions shall include all of the terms of probation imposed by the sentencing court.

Notice of the board’s determination shall be given to the person being considered, the correctional official having him or her in custody, if applicable, the district attorney who submitted any information or objection, and the victim if the victim has expressed a desire for such notification and has provided the board with a current mailing or email address and telephone number.

If a person in custody is granted a pardon, parole, or conditional release, the correctional official having such person in custody, upon notification thereof, shall inform him or her of the terms and conditions thereof and shall, in strict accordance therewith, release the person.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 14; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1596, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 192, § 2/SB 151; Ga. L. 2013, p. 222, § 19/HB 349; Ga. L. 2015, p. 207, § 4/HB 71; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-11/SB 174; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 42/HB 497.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added subsection (b); and redesignated former subsections (b) through (e) as present subsections (c) through (f), respectively. See editor’s note for applicability.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(5); redesignated former paragraph (a)(6) as paragraph (a)(7) and added new paragraph (a)(6); in paragraph (a)(7), as redesignated, added“, including any information prepared by the victim or any individual offering or preparing information on behalf of the victim, for the purpose of the board’s consideration of a pardon or commutation of a death sentence if the victim has provided such information to the board; and” at the end; and added paragraph (a)(8); in subsection (c), designated the formerly existing provisions as paragraph (c)(3), and added paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(2); substituted the present provisions of subsection (d) for the former provisions, which read: “Before releasing any person on parole, the board may have the person appear before it and may personally examine him or her. Thereafter, upon consideration the board shall make its findings and determine whether or not such person shall be granted a pardon, parole, or other relief within the power of the board; and the board shall determine the terms and conditions thereof. Notice of the determination shall be given to such person and to the correctional official having him or her in custody.”; in subsection (e), inserted “in custody” near the beginning and substituted “official having such person” for “officials having the person” near the middle; and deleted former subsection (f), which read: “The board shall send written notification of the parole decision to the victim or, if the victim is no longer living, to the family of the victim.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added paragraph (a)(2); redesignated former paragraphs (a)(2) through (a)(8) as present paragraphs (a)(3) through (a)(9), respectively; inserted “parole, conditional release,” in the middle of present paragraphs (a)(7) and (a)(8); in paragraph (c)(1), inserted “and at least 90 days’ advance written notification to such district attorney prior to making a final decision on parole or conditional release for a person sentence for a serious violent felony, as such term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1,” near the middle and substituted “actions and shall also provide the person being considered for parole or conditional release an opportunity to submit information” for “action” at the end; in paragraph (d)(1), inserted “or conditional release” near the middle of the first sentence, added the third sentence, and, in the last sentence, substituted “reports, files, records, information” for “records, papers, documents” near the beginning and added “, and if such person is serving a split sentence, the board’s conditions shall include all of the terms of probation imposed by the sentencing court” at the end; substituted “if the victim has expressed a desire for such notification and has provided the board with a current mailing or e-mail address and telephone number” for “in accordance with Code Section 17-17-13” at the end of paragraph (d)(2); and substituted “pardon, parole, or conditional release,” for “pardon or a parole,” near the beginning of subsection (e).

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “email” for “e-mail” in the middle of the third sentence of paragraph (d)(1), and near the end of paragraph (d)(2).

Cross references.

Power of board to order adult offender to make restitution to victim as condition of any relief ordered, §

17-14-3

.

Power of board to grant parole prior to completion of one-third of sentence if restitution of victim is ordered as condition of parole, §

17-14-4

.

Crime Victims’ Bill of Rights, T. 17, C. 17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 222, § 21/HB 349, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2013, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date. Any offense occurring before July 1, 2013, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Appeal and Error: Appeal or Certiorari by State in Criminal Cases,” see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 17 (2013).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

42-9-43.1.
Citizenship status of prisoner; deportation.

In determining whether to grant parole the board shall be authorized to make inquiry into whether the prisoner is lawfully present in the United States under federal law.

If the board determines that the prisoner is not lawfully present in the United States, the board shall be authorized to make inquiry into whether the prisoner would be legally subject to deportation from the United States while on parole.

If the board determines that the prisoner would be legally subject to deportation from the United States while on parole, the board may:

Consider the interest of the state in securing certain and complete execution of its judicial sentences in criminal cases;

Consider the likelihood that deportation may intervene to frustrate that state interest if parole is granted; and

Where appropriate, decline to grant parole in furtherance of the state interest in certain and complete execution of sentences.

Any grant of parole to an alien prisoner, as such term is defined in Code Section 42-1-11.1, who is subject to deportation shall be conditioned upon the deportation of such prisoner pursuant to a final removal order and a further condition that such prisoner abide by the deportation order and all immigration laws of the United States.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-9-43.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 34, § 2/SB 23; Ga. L. 2010, p. 263, § 3/SB 136.

Cross references.

Factoring into sentencing determinations citizenship status of convict, §

17-10-1.3

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 34, § 3/HB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The General Assembly finds that this Act states factors for consideration in discretionary decision-making processes within the criminal justice system. The General Assembly finds that such factors could have been considered prior to or without the enactment of this Act. Accordingly, it is the intention of the General Assembly that this Act may be applied with respect to offenses committed prior to its effective date as well as offenses committed on or after its effective date. However, if there should be a judicial determination that retrospective application is prohibited, it is the intention of the General Assembly that retrospective application should be severable.” This Act became effective May 11, 2007.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 263, § 1/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure that alien prisoners subject to deportation are not released from prison into the Georgia community. It is further the intent of this legislative body to reduce the costs and expenses of operating state prisons by reducing the number of alien prisoners incarcerated in the Georgia penal system and to expedite the deportation process of such prisoners. Moreover, Georgia should support the rearrest and revocation of parole of any alien prisoner who reenters the United States in violation of a release on a reprieve with a detainer to United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement. The General Assembly intends to require state agencies to take part in the Immigration and Customs Enforcement Rapid Removal of Eligible Parolees Accepted for Transfer (REPAT) Program funded and operated by the United States government and take all measures to fully cooperate and communicate with state, local, and federal agencies for the implementation of such program.”